Utah statutes.
62A-11-305.   Support collection services requested by agency of another state.

(1)  In accordance with Title 78B, Chapter 14, Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, the office may proceed to issue or modify an order under Section 62A-11-304.2 to collect under this part from an obligor who is located in or is a resident of this state regardless of the presence or residence of the obligee if:

(a)  support collection services are requested by an agency of another state that is operating under Part IV-D of the Social Security Act; or

(b) an individual applies for services.

(2)  The office shall use high-volume automated administrative enforcement, to the same extent it is used for intrastate cases, in response to a request made by another state's IV-D child support agency to enforce support orders.

(3)  A request by another state shall constitute a certification by the requesting state:

(a)  of the amount of support under the order of payment of which is in arrears; and

(b)  that the requesting state has complied with procedural due process requirements applicable to the case.

(4)  The office shall give automated administrative interstate enforcement requests the same priority as a two-state referral received from another state to enforce a support order.

(5)  The office shall promptly report the results of the enforcement procedures to the requesting state.

(6)  As required by the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(14), the office shall maintain records of:

(a)  the number of requests for enforcement assistance received by the office under this section;

(b)  the number of cases for which the state collected support in response to those requests; and

(c)  the amount of support collected.

